North Carolina statutes. Chapter 116. Higher Education.
Article 1. The University of North Carolina.
§ 116-43.1.
Institute for Transportation Research and Education.

The Board of Governors of the University of North Carolina is authorized to establish an Institute for Transportation Research and Education to facilitate the development of a broad program of transportation research and education involving other organizations and institutions which have related programs. The immediate purpose of the Institute shall be to create a management structure to coordinate and eventually merge the Highway Safety Programs of the National Driving Center and the North Carolina Highway Safety Research Center. The Board of Governors of the University of North Carolina is further authorized to establish a Council for Transportation Research and Education to represent all interests in transportation research and education, including but not limited to transportation safety.

History.

1975, 2nd Sess., c. 983, s. 57.

§ 116-43.5.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2011-145, s. 9.18(c), as amended by Session Laws 2012-142, s. 9.2(c), effective July 1, 2012.

History.

2003-429, s. 1; 2007-323, s. 9.13(b); 2012-142, s. 9.2(c); repealed by 2011-145, s. 9.18(c), as amended by 2012-142, s. 9.2(c), effective July 1, 2012.

§ 116-43.10.
Academic Common Market program.

The Southern Regional Education Board operates an Academic Common Market program. Under this program, qualified students from participating states may apply to attend programs at public universities in participating states that are not available in their home state’s university system. North Carolina’s participation for graduate programs provides a cost-effective means of offering educational access for North Carolina residents. North Carolinians are able to attend graduate programs that are not available at The University of North Carolina at reduced rates, and the State avoids the cost associated with the development of new academic programs.

The Board of Governors of The University of North Carolina may continue participation in the Southern Regional Education Board’s Academic Common Market at the graduate program level. The Board of Governors shall examine the graduate programs offered in The University of North Carolina System and select for participation only those graduate programs that are likely to be unique or are not commonly available in other Southern Regional Education Board states. Out-of-state tuition shall be waived for students who are residents of other Southern Regional Education Board states and who are participating in the Academic Common Market program. If accepted into The University of North Carolina graduate programs that are part of the Academic Common Market, these students shall pay in-State tuition and shall be treated for all purposes of The University of North Carolina as residents of North Carolina.

Once a student is enrolled in The University of North Carolina System under the Academic Common Market program, the student shall be entitled to pay in-State tuition as long as the student is enrolled in that graduate program.

History.

2005-276, s. 9.24; 2013-410, s. 36.5.

§ 116-43.15.
Use of college or university facilities by public school students pursuant to cooperative programs.

The existing facilities of any constituent institution of The University of North Carolina and the existing facilities of any private college or university licensed in accordance with

G.S. 116-15

that comply with the North Carolina State Building Code and applicable local ordinances for those facilities may be used without modification for public school students in joint or cooperative programs such as middle or early college programs and dual enrollment programs. Designs for new facilities of any constituent institution of The University of North Carolina and new facilities of any private college or university licensed in accordance with

G.S. 116-15

that comply with the North Carolina State Building Code and applicable local ordinances for those facilities may be used without modification for public school students in joint or cooperative programs such as middle or early college programs and dual enrollment programs.

For the purpose of establishing Use and Occupancy Classifications, these programs shall be considered “Business — Group B” in the same manner as other college and university uses.

History.

2006-66, s. 8.11(b); 2006-221, s. 5; 2009-305, s. 5.

§ 116-43.16.
Small business counseling information.

Documents submitted to The University of North Carolina’s Small Business and Technology Development Centers by an individual seeking business counseling or technical assistance and documents created by a Center to provide the individual with counseling and technical assistance are not public records as defined by

G.S. 132-1

.

History.

2011-297, s. 2.

§ 116-43.17.
Confidentiality of research data, records, and information of a proprietary nature.

Research data, records, or information of a proprietary nature, produced or collected by or for state institutions of higher learning in the conduct of commercial, scientific, or technical research where the data, records, or information has not been patented, published, or copyrighted are not public records as defined by

G.S. 132-1

.

History.

2014-115, s. 52.

§ 116-43.20.
Operation of 4-H camps.

North Carolina State University shall not close the 4-H camps listed in subdivisions (1) through (3) of this subsection. Further, North Carolina State University shall continue to operate each of those camps as 4-H camps and to offer programs and services at the sites of each of those camps at a level that is at least equivalent to the programs and services offered at each site as of June 30, 2013. The following three 4-H camps are to continue and are to be operated as 4-H camps as provided by this subsection:

Eastern 4-H Center located in Columbia, NC.

Millstone 4-H Camp located near Ellerbe, NC.

Betsy-Jeff Penn 4-H Educational Center located near Reidsville, NC.

The 4-H camps that were located at the sites listed in subdivisions (1) and (2) of this subsection have ceased to operate as 4-H camps. At the request of the board of county commissioners of any county that is the site of one of the defunct 4-H camps listed in this subsection, North Carolina State University shall consult with the board regarding actions that may be taken to reopen the 4-H camp in that county and other options that may be available for the use of the site.Within 90 days after any consultation with a board of county commissioners conducted pursuant to this subsection, North Carolina State University shall submit a written report to the Joint Legislative Education Oversight Committee, the Senate Appropriations Committee on Education/Higher Education, the House of Representatives Appropriations Subcommittee on Education, and the Fiscal Research Division regarding the feasibility of reopening the site as a 4-H camp and any other options considered for the use of the site.The list of defunct 4-H camps follows:

Anita-Alta 4-H Camp in the Pisgah National Forest in Lenoir, NC.

Swannanoa 4-H Camp located at Swannanoa, NC.

North Carolina State University shall take all practicable measures to operate the 4-H camps in a manner that will generate a positive fund balance in the institutional trust funds that account for the activities of the 4-H camps.

History.

2014-100, s. 11.7(a).

§ 116-43.30.
Advanced Placement courses for secondary school students.

It is the intent of the State to enhance accessibility and encourage secondary school students to enroll in and successfully complete more rigorous Advanced Placement courses to enable success in postsecondary education for all students. To attain this goal, to the extent funds are made available for this purpose, secondary school students enrolled in the North Carolina School of Science and Mathematics and the high school academic program at the University of North Carolina School of the Arts shall be exempt from paying any fees for registration and administration of examinations for Advanced Placement courses in which the student is enrolled, regardless of the score the student achieves on an examination.

The University of North Carolina System Office shall report annually by December 15 to the Senate Appropriations Committee on Education/Higher Education, the House Appropriations Committee on Education, the Fiscal Research Division, and the Joint Legislative Education Oversight Committee on Advanced Placement course information for the North Carolina School of Science and Mathematics and the high school academic program at the University of North Carolina School of the Arts. The report shall include, at a minimum, the following information from the prior fiscal year:

Number of students enrolled in Advanced Placement courses and participating in Advanced Placement course examinations, including demographic information by gender and race.

Student performance on Advanced Placement course examinations, including information by course and school.

Amount of State funds expended for fees for Advanced Placement courses by school.

History.

2021-180, s. 8.13(a).

Editor's Note.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 43.8, made this section, as added by Session Laws 2021-180, s. 8.13(a), effective July 1, 2022.

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 8.13(c), provides: “The initial report required pursuant to G.S. 116-43.30(b) shall be submitted to the Senate Appropriations Committee on Education/Higher Education, the House Appropriations Committee on Education, the Fiscal Research Division, and the Joint Legislative Education Oversight Committee by December 15, 2022.

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations Appropriations Act of 2021.’”

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 43.5, provides: “Except for statutory changes or other provisions that clearly indicate an intention to have effects beyond the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium, the textual provisions of this act apply only to funds appropriated for, and activities occurring during, the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium.”

Session Laws
2021-180, s.
43.7, is a severability clause.

§ 116-44.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1971, c. 1244, s. 1.

§ 116-44.1.
[Repealed]

Transferred to

G.S. 116-42

by Session Laws 1971, c. 1244, s. 11.

§ 116-44.2.
[Repealed]

Transferred to

G.S. 116-38

by Session Laws 1971, c. 1244, s. 7.

Part 6. Traffic and Parking.

§ 116-44.3.
Definitions.

Unless the context clearly requires another meaning, the following words and phrases have the meanings indicated when used in this Part:

“Board of trustees” and “constituent institution” have the meanings assigned in

G.S. 116-2

.

“Campus” means that University property, without regard to location, which is used wholly or partly for the purposes of a particular constituent institution of the University of North Carolina.

“University” means a constituent institution as defined in

G.S. 116-2

.

“University property” means property that is owned or leased in whole or in part by the State of North Carolina and which is subject to the general management and control of the Board of Governors of the University of North Carolina.

History.

1973, c. 495, s. 1.

§ 116-44.4.
Regulation of traffic and parking and registration of motor vehicles.

Except as otherwise provided in this Part, all of the provisions of Chapter 20 of the General Statutes relating to the use of highways of the State and the operation of motor vehicles thereon are applicable to all streets, alleys, driveways, parking lots, and parking structures on University property. Nothing in this section modifies any rights of ownership or control of University property, now or hereafter vested in the Board of Governors of the University of North Carolina or the State of North Carolina.

Each board of trustees may by ordinance prohibit, regulate, divert, control, and limit pedestrian or vehicular traffic and the parking of motor vehicles and other modes of conveyance on the campus. In fixing speed limits, the board of trustees is not subject to G.S. 20-141(f1) or (g2), but may fix any speed limit reasonable and safe under the circumstances as conclusively determined by the board of trustees. The board of trustees may not regulate traffic on streets open to the public as of right, except as specifically provided in this Part.

Each board of trustees may by ordinance provide for the registration of motor vehicles maintained or operated on the campus by any student, faculty member, or employee of the University, and may fix fees for such registration. The ordinance may make it unlawful for any person to operate an unregistered motor vehicle on the campus when the vehicle is required by the ordinance to be registered.

Each board of trustees may by ordinance set aside parking lots and other parking facilities on the campus for use by students, faculty, and employees of the University and members of the general public attending schools, conferences, or meetings at the University, visiting or making use of any University facilities, or attending to official business with the University. The board of trustees may issue permits to park in these lots and garages and may charge a fee therefor. The board of trustees may also by ordinance make it unlawful for any person to park a motor vehicle in any lot or other parking facility without procuring the requisite permit and displaying it on the vehicle. No permit to park shall be issued until the student requesting the permit provides the name of the insurer, the policy number under which the student has financial responsibility, and the student certifies that the motor vehicle is insured at the levels set in G.S. 20-279.1(11) or higher. This subsection applies to motor vehicles that are registered in other states as well as motor vehicles that are registered in this State pursuant to Chapter 20 of the General Statutes.

Each board of trustees may by ordinance set aside spaces in designated parking areas or facilities in which motor vehicles may be parked for specified periods of time. To regulate parking in such spaces, the board of trustees may install a system of parking meters and make it unlawful for any person to park a motor vehicle in a metered space without activating the meter for the entire time that the vehicle is parked, up to the maximum length of time allowed for that space. The meters may be activated by coins of the United States. The board of trustees may also install automatic gates, employ attendants, and use any other device or procedure to control access to and collect the fees for using its parking areas and facilities.

The board of trustees may by ordinance provide for the issuance of stickers, decals, permits, or other indicia representing the registration status of vehicles or the eligibility of vehicles to park on the campus and may by ordinance prohibit the forgery, counterfeiting, unauthorized transfer, or unauthorized use of them.

Violation of an ordinance adopted under any portion of this Part is an infraction as defined in

G.S. 14-3.1

and is punishable by a penalty of not more than fifty dollars ($50.00). An ordinance may provide that certain prohibited acts shall not be infractions and in such cases the provisions of subsection (h) may be used to enforce the ordinance.

An ordinance adopted under any portion of this Part may provide that violation subjects the offender to a civil penalty. Penalties may be graduated according to the seriousness of the offense or the number of prior offenses by the person charged. Each board of trustees may establish procedures for the collection of these penalties and they may be enforced by civil action in the nature of debt. The board of trustees may also provide for appropriate administrative sanctions if an offender does not pay a validly due penalty or upon repeated offenses. Appropriate administrative sanctions include, but are not limited to, revocation of parking permits, termination of vehicle registration, and termination or suspension of enrollment in or employment by the University.

An ordinance adopted under any portion of this Part may provide that any vehicle illegally parked may be removed to a storage area. Regardless of whether a constituent institution does its own removal and disposal of motor vehicles or contracts with another person to do so, the institution shall provide a hearing procedure for the owner. For purposes of this subsection, the definitions in

G.S. 20-219.9

apply.

If the institution operates in such a way that the person who tows the vehicle is responsible for collecting towing fees, all provisions of Article 7A, Chapter 20, apply.

If the institution operates in such a way that it is responsible for collecting towing fees, it shall:

Provide by contract or ordinance for a schedule of reasonable towing fees,

Provide a procedure for a prompt fair hearing to contest the towing,

Provide for an appeal to district court from that hearing,

Authorize release of the vehicle at any time after towing by the posting of a bond or paying of the fees due, and

If the institution chooses to enforce its authority by sale of the vehicle, provide a sale procedure similar to that provided in

G.S. 44A-4

, 44A-5, and 44A-6, except that no hearing in addition to the probable cause hearing is required. If no one purchases the vehicle at the sale and if the value of the vehicle is less than the amount of the lien, the institution may destroy it.

Evidence that a motor vehicle was found parked or unattended in violation of an ordinance of the board of trustees is prima facie evidence that the vehicle was parked by:

The person holding a University parking permit for the vehicle, or

If no University parking permit has been issued for the vehicle, the person in whose name the vehicle is registered with the University pursuant to subsection (c), or

If no University parking permit has been issued for the vehicle and the vehicle is not registered with the University, the person in whose name it is registered with the North Carolina Division of Motor Vehicles or the corresponding agency of another state or nation.

The rule of evidence established by this subsection applies only in civil, criminal, or administrative actions or proceedings concerning violations of ordinances of the board of trustees.

G.S. 20-162.1

does not apply to such actions or proceedings.

Each board of trustees shall cause to be posted appropriate notice to the public of applicable traffic and parking restrictions.

All ordinances adopted under this Part shall be recorded in the minutes of the board of trustees and copies thereof shall be filed in the offices of the President of the University of North Carolina and the Secretary of State. Each board of trustees shall provide for printing and distributing copies of its traffic and parking ordinances.

All moneys received pursuant to this Part, except for the clear proceeds of all civil penalties collected pursuant to subsection (h) of this section, shall be placed in a trust account in each constituent institution, are appropriated, and may be used for any of the following purposes:

To defray the cost of administering and enforcing ordinances adopted under this Part;

To develop, maintain, and supervise parking areas and facilities;

To provide bus service or other transportation systems and facilities, including payments to any public or private transportation system serving University students, faculty, or employees;

As a pledge to secure revenue bonds for parking facilities issued under Article 21 of this Chapter;

Other purposes related to parking, traffic, and transportation on the campus.

The clear proceeds of all civil penalties collected pursuant to subsection (h) of this section shall be remitted to the Civil Penalty and Forfeiture Fund in accordance with

G.S. 115C-457.2

.

History.

1973, c. 495, s. 1; 1975, c. 716, s. 5; 1981 (Reg. Sess., 1982), c. 1239, s. 3; 1983, c. 420, s. 5; 1985, c. 764, s. 36; 2001-336, s. 1; 2005-276, s. 6.37(r); 2006-203, s. 51.

§ 116-44.5.
Special provisions applicable to identified constituent institutions of the University of North Carolina.

In addition to the powers granted by

G.S. 116-44.4

, the board of trustees of each of the constituent institutions enumerated hereinafter shall have the additional powers prescribed:

The Board of Trustees of the University of North Carolina at Chapel Hill may by ordinance prohibit, regulate, and limit the parking of motor vehicles on those portions of the following public streets in the Town of Chapel Hill where parking is not prohibited by an ordinance of the Town of Chapel Hill:

Battle Lane;

Country Club Road, between Raleigh Street and South Road;

Manning Drive;

McCauley Street, between Columbia Street and Pittsboro Street;

Pittsboro Street, between South Columbia Street and Cameron Avenue;

Boundary Street, between Country Club Road and East Franklin Street;

Park Place, between Boundary Street and East Franklin Street;

South Columbia Street, between Franklin Street and Manning Drive;

Cameron Avenue, between South Columbia Street and Raleigh Street;

Raleigh Street;

Ridge Road;

South Road, between Columbia Street and Country Club Road.

In addition, the Board of Trustees of the University of North Carolina at Chapel Hill may regulate traffic on Cameron Avenue, between Raleigh Street and South Columbia Street, and on Raleigh Street, in any manner not inconsistent with ordinances of the Town of Chapel Hill.

The Board of Trustees of Appalachian State University may by ordinance prohibit, regulate, and limit the parking of motor vehicles on those portions of the following public streets in the Town of Boone where parking is not prohibited by an ordinance of the Town of Boone:

Rivers Street, between U.S. 221-U.S. 321 (Hardin Street) and Water Street;

Stadium Drive, between Rivers Street and Hemlock Drive;

College Street, to the extent that it is bounded on both sides by the university campus;

Appalachian Street, between Locust Street and Howard Street;

Brown Street, between Locust Street and Howard Street;

Hill Street, only on the half of Hill Street bounded by the university campus;

Stansberry Circle, from Holmes Drive to the end of Stansberry Circle;

Locust Street, from U.S. 221-U.S. 321 (Hardin Street) to the end of Locust Street; and

Dale Street, from State Farm Road to the end of Dale Street.

The Board of Trustees of the University of North Carolina at Charlotte may by ordinance prohibit, regulate, and limit the parking of motor vehicles on those portions of the following public roads in the County of Mecklenburg where parking is not prohibited by ordinance or other source of legal regulation of the County of Mecklenburg or other governmental entity with jurisdiction to regulate parking on such public road:

Mary Alexander Boulevard (State Road No. 2834), between its intersection with N.C. Highway 49 and its intersection with Mallard Creek Church Road.

In addition, the Board of Trustees of the University of North Carolina at Charlotte may regulate traffic on Mary Alexander Boulevard (State Road No. 2834), between its intersection with N.C. Highway 49 and its intersection with Mallard Creek Church Road, in any manner not inconsistent with any ordinances or other sources of legal regulation of the County of Mecklenburg or other governmental entity with jurisdiction to regulate traffic on such public road.

(3a)

The Board of Trustees of the University of North Carolina at Wilmington may by ordinance prohibit, regulate, and limit the parking of motor vehicles on those portions of the following public streets in the City of Wilmington where parking is not prohibited by an ordinance of the City of Wilmington:

a.

“H” Street.

(3b)

The Board of Trustees of the University of North Carolina at Greensboro may by ordinance prohibit, regulate, and limit the parking of motor vehicles for those portions of any of the following public streets in the City of Greensboro where parking is not prohibited by an ordinance of the City of Greensboro:

a.

Forest Street between Oakland Avenue and Spring Garden Street.

Highland Avenue between Oakland Avenue and Spring Garden Street.

Jefferson Street between Spring Garden Street and the Walker/Aycock parking lot.

Kenilworth Street between Oakland Avenue and Walker Avenue.

McIver Street between Walker Avenue and West Market Street.

Stirling Street between Oakland Avenue and Walker Avenue.

Theta Street between Kenilworth Street and Stirling Street.

Walker Avenue between Aycock Street and Jackson Library and between Tate Street and McIver Street.

(3c)

The Board of Trustees of North Carolina Agricultural and Technical State University may by ordinance prohibit, regulate, and limit the parking of motor vehicles on those portions of the following streets in the City of Greensboro where parking is not prohibited by an ordinance of the City of Greensboro:

a.

Dudley Street between Market Street and Bluford Street.

b.

Bluford Street between Regan Street and Luther Street.

c.

Laurel Street between Lindsay Street and East Market Street.

d.

Benbow Road between Sullivan Street and East Market Street.

e.

Sullivan Street between O’Henry Boulevard overpass and Lindsay Street.

f.

Beech Street between Bluford Street and Lindsay Street.

g.

Obermeyer Street between Bluford Street and Market Street.

h.

Daniel Street between Bluford Street and Market Street.

Nocho Street between Bluford Street and Market Street.

In addition, the Board of Trustees of North Carolina A&T State University may regulate traffic on the following streets for the portion of those streets that abut the university: Benbow Road, Dudley Street, Lindsay Street, and Market Street, provided that the regulation is not inconsistent with ordinances of the City of Greensboro.

This section does not diminish the authority of any affected municipality, county or other governmental entity to prohibit parking on any public street or road listed herein. It is intended only to authorize the respective boards of trustees of the constituent institutions identified hereinabove to further prohibit, regulate, and limit parking on certain public streets and roads running through or adjacent to the campuses of the constituent institutions where parking is not prohibited by ordinance or other law of any affected municipality, county or other governmental entity. When an ordinance or other law of an affected municipality, county or other governmental entity is adopted to prohibit parking on any portion of any public street or road then regulated by an ordinance of a board of trustees, the ordinance of the board of trustees is superseded and the University, upon request of the municipality, county or other governmental entity, shall immediately remove any signs, devices, or markings erected or placed by the University on that portion of the street or road pursuant to the superseded ordinance.

History.

1973, c. 495, s. 1; 1979, c. 238; 2001-170, s. 1; 2003-213, s. 1; 2005-165, s. 1.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2005-165, s. 1, effective July 7, 2005, added subdivision (3c).

Part 7. Fire Safety.

§ 116-44.6.
Definitions.

Unless the context clearly requires another meaning, the following definitions apply in this Part:

Fraternity or sorority. — A social, professional, or educational incorporated organization that, by official recognition, is affiliated or identified with a public or nonpublic institution of higher education in this State and which maintains a living facility that provides accommodations for five or more students enrolled at the recognition-granting institution of higher education.

Fund. — The Fire Safety Loan Fund authorized by this Part.

Living facility. — A sleeping facility capable of overnight accommodation and other capabilities which support continuous occupancy.

Residence hall. — A living facility maintained by a public or nonpublic institution of higher education in North Carolina or by the North Carolina School of Science and Mathematics for use by enrolled students.

Supplemental fire safety protection system. — A water system capability which is sized to accommodate the added water supply pressure and volume required for building fire protection.

Water system. —

A city, county, or sanitary district; or

A water and sewer authority, a metropolitan water district, or county water and sewer district, established pursuant to Chapter 162A of the General Statutes.

History.

1996, 2nd Ex. Sess., c. 18, s. 16.5(a).

§ 116-44.7.
Exemption from certain fees and charges.

No water system serving a residence hall or fraternity or sorority housing shall levy or collect any water-meter fee, water-hydrant fee, tap fee, or similar service fee on a residence hall or fraternity or sorority house with respect to supporting a supplemental fire safety protection system in excess of the marginal cost to the water system to support the fire safety protection system.

History.

1996, 2nd Ex. Sess., c. 18, s. 16.5(a); 1997-443, s. 10.14.

§ 116-44.8.
Fire Safety Loan Fund.

There is established the Fire Safety Loan Fund. The Fund shall be a revolving loan fund for installing fire safety equipment and systems in fraternity and sorority housing.

The Fund shall be administered by the Office of the State Treasurer, and that office may establish the policies and procedures that it deems appropriate for the operation of the Fund. The Office of the State Treasurer may enlist the assistance of other State departments or entities which have expertise that would be useful in administering the Fund, and those State departments or entities shall provide the assistance requested.

The Fund shall be operated on a revolving basis with proceeds from the repayment of prior loans being made available for subsequent loans.

Loans from the Fund shall be secured by a first or second mortgage or other pledge. Loans shall be made for a period not to exceed 10 years. Interest shall not be charged on loans from the Fund.

History.

1996, 2nd Ex. Sess., c. 18, s. 16.5(a).

§ 116-44.9.

Reserved for future codification purposes.